Arkansas, session 2025, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 111, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-111. Prohibition on limiting certain lawn care devices –
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Lawn care device" means an object used for lawn care,
maintenance, or landscaping that is powered by an energy source or consumes
an energy source to accomplish a significant part of the intended function of
the object; and
(2) "Local government" means:
(A) A county;
*SSS053*
02-13-2025 10:12:14 SSS053

As Engrossed: S2/13/25 HB1075
(B) A city of the first class, a city of the second class,
or an incorporated town; or
(C) An instrumentality of a county, a city of the first
class, a city of the second class, or an incorporated town.
(b) A local government shall not:
(1) Restrict the use or sale of a lawn care device to a private
person or entity based on the energy source that is used to power the lawn
care device or that is consumed by the lawn care device; or
(2)(A) Impose an excise tax or other fee on the use of a lawn
care device based on the energy source that is used to power the lawn care
device or that is consumed by the lawn care device.
(B) Subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section does not
prohibit a local government from levying a sales and use tax.
(c) This section does not prohibit a local government from:
(1) Purchasing or using a lawn care device that uses a
particular energy source; or
(2) Enacting or enforcing a noise ordinance.

/s/Ray

















02-13-2025 10:12:14 SSS053